Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201667-401
Act, how cited.

Sections 67-401 to 67-467 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Partnership Act of 1998.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1050, § 1.